Tennessee statutes. Title 31 Descent And Distribution
Chapter 6

Escheat of Decedents' Estates

31-6-101. Escheat generally.

If a decedent, whether or not domiciled in this state, leaves no one to take the decedent's estate or any portion of the estate by the decedent's will and no one other than a government or governmental subdivision or agency to take the decedent's estate or a portion of the estate by intestate succession, under the laws of this state or any other jurisdiction, the estate escheats as of the time of the decedent's death in accordance with this chapter.

Property passing to the state under this chapter, whether held by the state or its officers, is subject to the same liens, charges and trusts to which it would have been subject if it had passed by will or intestate succession.

Acts 1979, ch. 226, § 1; T.C.A., § 31-801.

Cross-References. Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed Property Act, title 66, ch. 29.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 3, 831, 869, 1126.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1986, 54 Tenn. L. Rev. 457 (1987).

31-6-102. Escheat of real property.

Real property located in this state escheats to this state in accordance with § 31-6-101.

Acts 1979, ch. 226, § 2; T.C.A., § 31-802.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 831.

31-6-103. Escheat of tangible personal property customarily kept in this state.

All tangible personal property owned by the decedent, wherever located at the decedent's death, that was customarily kept in this state prior to the decedent's death, escheats to this state in accordance with § 31-6-101.

Acts 1979, ch. 226, § 3; T.C.A., § 31-803.

Cross-References. Intervention, Tenn. R. Civ. P. 24.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 831.

31-6-104. Escheat of tangible personal property subject to administration in this state.

Subject to subsection (b), all tangible personal property owned by a decedent that is subject to the control of a court of this state for the purposes of administration escheats to this state in accordance with § 31-6-101.

Property that otherwise falls within subsection (a) does not escheat to this state but goes to another jurisdiction if the other jurisdiction claims the property and establishes that:

The other jurisdiction is entitled to the property under its laws;

The decedent customarily kept the property in that jurisdiction prior to the decedent's death; and

This state has the right to escheat and take tangible personal property being administered as part of a decedent's estate in the other jurisdiction if the decedent customarily kept the property in this state prior to the decendent's death.

Acts 1979, ch. 226, § 4; T.C.A., § 31-804.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 831.

31-6-105. Escheat of intangible personal property of decedent domiciled in this state.

All intangible property owned by a decedent escheats to this state in accordance with § 31-6-101 if the decedent was domiciled in this state at the time of the decedent's death.

Acts 1979, ch. 226, § 5; T.C.A., § 31-805.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 831.

31-6-106. Escheat of intangible personal property subject to administration in this state.

Subject to subsection (b), all intangible property owned by a decedent that is subject to the control of a court of this state for purposes of administration escheats to this state in accordance with § 31-6-101, whether or not the decedent was domiciled in this state at the decedent's death.

The property described in subsection (a) does not escheat to this state but goes to another jurisdiction, if the other jurisdiction claims the property and establishes that:

The other jurisdiction is entitled to the property under its laws;

The decedent was domiciled in that jurisdiction at the decedent's death; and

This state has the right to escheat and take intangible personal property being administered as part of a decedent's estate in that jurisdiction if the decedent was domiciled in this state at the decedent's death.

Acts 1979, ch. 226, § 6; T.C.A., § 31-806.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 831.

31-6-107. Reports concerning property that may be subject to escheat.

All administrators, executors, trustees, guardians, or other fiduciaries having in their custody or control property that may be subject to escheat pursuant to this chapter shall promptly, after obtaining knowledge as to facts indicating the possibility of the escheat of any such property, file with the state treasurer a report on such forms as the state treasurer may prescribe, showing, with such other information as the treasurer may require, the nature, location and approximate value of the property, the basis for believing that it may be subject to escheat, and whether there are any other persons who have asserted or may assert claims to the property.

The department of revenue shall review all inheritance or estate tax returns filed with it for the purpose of determining whether the estates include property that may be subject to escheat under this chapter and shall report any such property to the state treasurer.

Acts 1979, ch. 226, § 7; T.C.A., § 31-807; Acts 1986, ch. 539, § 3.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 831, 844, 1127.

31-6-108. Surrender and retention of property subject to escheat.

Any person having custody of or control over property subject to escheat under this chapter may be fully released from any responsibility or liability with respect thereto by surrendering or delivering same to the state treasurer and formally disclaiming any interest therein.

In the event property subject to escheat under this chapter is not surrendered or delivered to the treasurer as provided in subsection (a), the property shall be held until a final determination of the question of escheat by a court of competent jurisdiction as provided in this chapter, in which case the person having custody of or control over the property shall not be discharged from the person's duties as a fiduciary or personal representative until there has been a final determination of the question.

Acts 1979, ch. 226, § 8; T.C.A., § 31-808.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 831.

31-6-109. Suit involving escheat property — Duties of state treasurer and attorney general and reporter.

Following notice to the state treasurer that a suit involving escheat property has been commenced, the state treasurer shall notify the attorney general and reporter of the action and together they shall determine what action, if any, shall be taken by the attorney general and reporter in order to protect the state's interest.

The state treasurer shall be kept informed by the party filing the initial notice of all pleadings filed with the court regardless of any action taken by the attorney general and reporter.

The state treasurer, through the attorney general and reporter, may intervene in the lawsuit at any stage in the proceeding if necessary to protect the state's interest.

Acts 1979, ch. 226, § 9; T.C.A., § 31-809; Acts 1986, ch. 539, § 4.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 831.

31-6-110. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 31-6-110 (Acts 1979, ch. 226, § 10; T.C.A., § 31-810), concerning joinder, was repealed by Acts 1986, ch. 539, § 5.

31-6-111. Intervention.

Any person, except another state, who claims an interest in any property that is the subject of an escheat proceeding under this chapter may intervene by filing a petition in that proceeding, setting forth the basis of the person's claim, which petitions shall be disposed of by the court in determining whether the property has escheated pursuant to this chapter.

If any other state claims an interest in any property that is the subject of an escheat proceeding under this chapter, the other state may file an intervening petition in the suit for the determination of its claim, if the other state provides for the determination of claims by this state under similar circumstances.

Acts 1979, ch. 226, § 11; T.C.A., § 31-811.

Cross-References. Intervention, Tenn. R. Civ. P. 24.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 831.

Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 1-24.02-1.

31-6-112. Determination of title.

In any escheat proceeding where the court determines that the property has not escheated to this state, the court shall determine what person or persons is or are entitled to the property or its proceeds.

Acts 1979, ch. 226, § 12; T.C.A., § 31-812.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 831.

31-6-113. Sale pending determination.

In any escheat proceeding where the court determines a sale of the property prior to the final determination of the case to be advisable in order to protect the true owner from loss and to realize the maximum proceeds following notice to the treasurer by the representative of the estate, the court may order such a sale on such terms and in such manner as it deems advisable. In case such a sale is ordered, the proceeds shall be disposed of as the original property would have been but for the sale.

Acts 1979, ch. 226, § 13; T.C.A., § 31-813; Acts 1986, ch. 539, § 6.

31-6-114. Joinder of treasurer in case that may involve property subject to escheat.

In any case in any court of this state involving the title to any property, including, but not limited to, proceedings involving the validity or construction of wills, where it appears that the property may be subject to escheat under this chapter, the state treasurer shall be made a party defendant therein, either in the original pleadings, on motion of any party, on petition of the treasurer, or by the court on its own motion. Process shall be served on the treasurer as otherwise provided by law, and after making such investigation as the treasurer deems appropriate, the treasurer shall, through the attorney general and reporter, file such pleadings and take such position as may be determined to best protect the interest of the state.

In any such case, if the court decrees that the property has escheated to this state under this chapter, then no further proceeding shall be necessary to establish the state's right to the property and the property shall be disposed of by the treasurer as provided in § 61-6-116 for other property escheating to the state.

Acts 1979, ch. 226, § 14; T.C.A., § 31-814.

Cross-References. Joinder, Tenn. R. Civ. P. Rules 19 and 20.

31-6-115. Proceedings in other states.

In any case where it appears to the treasurer that property that is not subject to the jurisdiction of courts of this state has escheated to this state under this chapter and the other state provides a remedy to this state for the establishment of the rights of this state to such property, and it further appears to the treasurer that the value of the property justifies asserting the claim of this state, the treasurer shall request the attorney general and reporter and the attorney general and reporter shall take such action as deemed appropriate to assert the claim and protect the interest of this state.

This state may pay all reasonable costs incurred by any other state in any action brought by the other state at the request of the attorney general and reporter of this state under this section. Any state bringing such an action may be entitled additionally to a reward of up to fifteen percent (15%) of the value, after deducting reasonable costs, of any property recovered for this state as a direct or indirect result of the action.

Acts 1979, ch. 226, § 15; T.C.A., § 31-815.

31-6-116. Disposition of escheated property.

All escheated property delivered to the state treasurer under this chapter shall be held and disposed of in the same manner and together with other interest bearing property reported to the state treasurer under title 66, chapter 29, part 1.

Acts 1979, ch. 226, § 16; T.C.A., § 31-816; Acts 1986, ch. 539, § 7.

31-6-117, 31-6-118.
[Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §§ 31-6-117, 31-6-118 (Acts 1979, ch. 226, §§ 17, 18; T.C.A., §§ 31-817, 31-818), concerning deposit of funds and disposition of valueless property, were repealed by Acts 1986, ch. 539, §§ 8, 9. For current law, see § 31-6-116.

31-6-119. Claims for property of decedent.

Any person claiming to be entitled to the property of any decedent may file a claim thereto with the treasurer in accordance with title 66, chapter 29, part 1, governing the disposition of unclaimed property.

Acts 1979, ch. 226, § 19; T.C.A., § 31-819; Acts 1986, ch. 539, § 10.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 831.

31-6-120. Rules and regulations.

The treasurer is authorized to make necessary rules and regulations to carry out this chapter.

Acts 1979, ch. 226, § 20; T.C.A., § 31-820.

31-6-121. Excepted property.

This chapter shall not apply to any property that has been presumed abandoned or has escheated under the laws of another state prior to January 1, 1980.

Acts 1979, ch. 226, § 21; T.C.A., § 31-821.

31-6-122. Right of appeal.

All parties to any suit instituted under this chapter shall have the right to appeal in the manner provided by the Tennessee Rules of Appellate Procedure.

Acts 1981, ch. 449, § 2; T.C.A., § 31-822.